Texas statutes.
LABOR CODE

TITLE 4. EMPLOYMENT SERVICES AND UNEMPLOYMENT

SUBTITLE A. TEXAS UNEMPLOYMENT COMPENSATION ACT

CHAPTER 211. RECIPROCAL ARRANGEMENTS

Sec. 211.001. LOCATION OF SERVICE FOR UNEMPLOYMENT INSURANCE PURPOSES. The commission may enter into arrangements with an appropriate agency of another state or a federal agency under which an individual performing services in this and one or more other states for an employing unit is considered to be engaged in employment entirely in:

(1) this state;

(2) one of the other states in which the individual performs some of the services;

(3) the state of the individual's residence; or

(4) the state in which the employing unit maintains a place of business.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 211.002. LOCATION OF SERVICE OF STATE EMPLOYEES. (a) The commission may enter into a reciprocal arrangement with the appropriate agency of another state under which a state employee who performs services in the state that is not the employing state is considered to be engaged in employment performed entirely in the employing state.

(b) The commission shall enter the arrangement on request of an agency of this state that has an employee performing a service in another state.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 211.003. COMBINATION OF WAGES AND EMPLOYMENT. The commission shall participate in an arrangement for the payment of benefits determined by combining an individual's wages and employment covered under this subtitle and the wages and employment covered under the unemployment compensation laws of another state or the United States, or both, if the arrangement is approved by the United States secretary of labor in consultation with the state unemployment compensation agencies as reasonably calculated to ensure the prompt and full payment of benefits. The arrangement must provide for:

(1) applying the base period of one unemployment compensation law to a claim that combines an individual's wages and employment covered under two or more unemployment compensation laws; and

(2) avoiding the duplicate use of wages and employment because of the combination.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 211.004. OFFSET FOR OVERPAYMENT OF UNEMPLOYMENT BENEFITS. (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this subtitle, the commission may enter into a reciprocal arrangement with an appropriate state or federal agency, or both, that provides:

(1) an overpayment of benefits under this subtitle is recovered by offset from unemployment benefits otherwise payable under the unemployment compensation law of another state or of the United States; and

(2) an overpayment of unemployment benefits under the unemployment compensation law of the other state or the United States are recovered by offset from benefits payable under this subtitle.

(b) A procedure for notice and opportunity for a hearing that applies to the recovery of an overpayment of unemployment benefits paid under this subtitle applies to an offset of those benefits under this section.

(c) In this section, "unemployment benefits" means unemployment compensation benefits, trade adjustment allowances, and other unemployment assistance.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 211.005. INTERSTATE OR FOREIGN COMMERCE. The commission may enter into a reciprocal arrangement with the appropriate agency of another state or federal agency, or both, under which service on a vessel or aircraft engaged in interstate or foreign commerce for a single employer is considered to be performed in this state or in another state, regardless of where the service is performed.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 211.006. RECIPROCAL TREATMENT BY FEDERAL AGENCY. (a) The commission may enter into an agreement with the proper agency under an Act of Congress establishing an unemployment compensation system to provide reciprocal treatment to an individual:

(1) who has acquired a right to unemployment compensation under the Act of Congress after acquiring a potential right to benefits under this subtitle; or

(2) who has acquired a right to benefits under this subtitle after acquiring a potential right to unemployment compensation under the Act of Congress.

(b) An agreement under this section takes effect 10 days after the date on which the agreement is published in the manner provided for a rule.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.